Tennessee, session 114, HB2588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
LEAs and public charter schools may offer students in any of the grades five
through twelve (5-12) a hunter education course as part of physical education, health, or
safety instruction. A hunter education course offered pursuant to this section must be
approved by the wildlife resources agency as a hunter education course pursuant to §
70-2-108.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2588
012295
- 1 -